California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(ii) Within the construction footprint, or within 15 feet of the construction footprint, of a new accessory structure that is proposed to be constructed for the existing single-family residence.

(B) The removal of no more than 40 western Joshua trees or trimming of western Joshua trees by the proponent of a public works project if the western Joshua trees are within the construction footprint, or within 15 feet of the construction footprint,
 of a public works project to repair, rehabilitate, replace, or maintain an existing structure.

(2) (A) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each western Joshua tree five meters or greater in height.

(B) Fifty dollars ($50) for each western Joshua tree one meter or greater but less than five meters in height.

(C) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($37.50) for each western Joshua tree less than one meter in height.

(h) (1) The permittee shall bear responsibility for implementing measures to assist the survival of western Joshua trees relocated pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(2) Unless specifically required by written agreement, a landowner that agrees in writing to allow western Joshua trees to be relocated onto land it owns shall not be liable for the continued survival of the western Joshua trees, shall not be required to manage or maintain the translocated western Joshua trees, and shall not be required to change existing land use practices, provided
 that the land use practices do not result in the taking, possession, sale, or further translocation of the western Joshua trees.

(i) Until the department certifies a programmatic environmental impact report that addresses actions with the potential to result in limited take of western Joshua trees from single-family residences and accessory structures, and there is a final, unappealable judgment in litigation, if any, challenging the programmatic environmental impact report, or until January 1, 2032, whichever occurs first, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to the issuance of a permit pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 816, Sec. 1.   (AB 1808)   Effective September 29, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.3.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 1927.3 and 1927.4, a county or city operating under an approved delegation agreement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1927.3 or subdivision (b) of Section 1927.4 may authorize, by permit, without mitigation, both of the following:

(1) The removal of no more than 10 western Joshua trees or trimming of western Joshua trees by an owner-occupant of an existing single-family residence if the western Joshua trees are either of the following:

(A) Within 30 feet of the existing single-family residence or within 15 feet of an existing accessory structure.

(B) Within the construction footprint, or within 15 feet of the construction footprint, of a new accessory structure that is proposed to be constructed for the existing single-family residence.

(2) The removal of no more than 40 western Joshua trees or trimming of western Joshua trees by the proponent of a public works project if the western Joshua trees are within the construction footprint, or within 15 feet of the construction footprint, of a public works project to repair, rehabilitate, replace, or maintain an existing structure.

(b) A county or city issuing a permit under subdivision (a) may impose a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of issuing the permit.

(c) A property owner or proponent of a public works project
 seeking a permit under subdivision (a) shall submit a request to the county or city, as applicable, on a form to be provided by the county or city that requires the following information:

(1) The name, telephone number, mailing address, and email address of the property owner or proponent of the public works project seeking the permit.

(2) The street address of the single-family residence or public works project on which each western Joshua tree requested to be removed or trimmed is located. If a street address is not available, the property owner or proponent of the public works project shall include the assessor’s parcel number.

(3) A statement as to whether each western Joshua tree requested to
 be removed or trimmed meets the conditions described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), or paragraph (2), of subdivision (a).

(4) The size class of each western Joshua tree requested to be removed or trimmed, in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1927.3.

(5) The distance of each western Joshua tree requested to be removed or trimmed from the single-family residence, existing accessory structure, or construction footprint of a new accessory structure that is proposed to be constructed or of the public works project.

(6) Photographs of each western Joshua tree requested to be removed or trimmed that depict its location relative to the single-family residence, existing accessory
 structure, or construction footprint of a new accessory structure that is proposed to be constructed or of the public works project.

(d) Within 60 days of receipt of a request for a permit pursuant to subdivision (c), the county or city, as applicable, shall do either of the following:

(1) Notify the property owner or proponent of the public works project that the county or city, as applicable, will issue a permit for the removal or trimming of a western Joshua tree.

(2) Deny the request if the request does not demonstrate a permit can be issued pursuant to this section. A denial shall include a brief description explaining why a permit cannot be issued.

(e) Until the department certifies a programmatic environmental impact report that addresses actions with the potential to result in limited take of western Joshua trees from single-family residences and accessory structures, and there is a final, unappealable judgment in litigation, if any, challenging the programmatic environmental impact report, or until January 1, 2032, whichever occurs first, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to the issuance of a permit pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 816, Sec. 2.   (AB 1808)   Effective September 29, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.4.

(a) The department may issue a permit to authorize either the removal or trimming of dead western Joshua trees or the trimming of live western Joshua trees.

(1) Upon receipt of a permit and payment of any applicable administrative fees, a property owner or its agent may remove a detached dead western Joshua tree or the detached limb of a western Joshua tree. All other removals and all trimming of western Joshua trees authorized by permits issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be completed by a desert native plant specialist.

(2) The department may issue permits pursuant to this section, without payment of fees or other mitigation, provided that the dead western Joshua trees
 or any limbs to be removed meet one of the following:

(A) Have fallen over and are within 30 feet of a structure.

(B) Are leaning against an existing structure.

(C) Create an imminent threat to public health or safety.

(3) A property owner seeking a permit pursuant to this subdivision shall submit a permit request to the department on a form to be provided by the department that requires the following information:

(A) The name, telephone number, mailing address, and email address of the property owner seeking the permit.

(B) The street address of the property on which the western Joshua trees to be removed or trimmed are
 located. If no street address is available, the property owner shall include the assessor’s parcel number.

(C) Photographs of the western Joshua trees that visually depict the dead trees or the trees to be trimmed and that demonstrate that the western Joshua tree meets one or more of the requirements of paragraph (2).

(D) A signed attestation from the property owner or signed certification by a desert native plant specialist that the tree meets the definition of a dead western Joshua tree.

(4) (A) Within 30 days of receipt of a request for a permit pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), the department shall either issue a permit allowing for the removal or trimming, or deny the request if the request does not demonstrate a permit can be issued pursuant to this section.

(B) Within 10 days of receipt of a request for a permit pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2), the department shall either issue a permit allowing for the removal or trimming, or deny the request if the request does not demonstrate a permit can be issued pursuant to this section.

(C) If the department issues a permit, it shall provide the property owner 60 days in which to complete the removal or trimming. The department may extend this 60-day period in writing at its discretion.

(D) If the department denies the permit request, the property owner may resubmit the request with additional information and photographs. Resubmissions pursuant to this subdivision shall be processed as new permit requests.

(5) Within 30 days of completing the removal or
 trimming of one or more western Joshua trees in accordance with a permit issued pursuant to this section, the property owner shall submit, by mail or email, photographs of the site at which the western Joshua trees were removed or trimmed pursuant to the permit.

(b) The department may enter into an agreement with any county or city to delegate to the county or city the ability to authorize the removal or trimming of dead western Joshua trees or the trimming of live western Joshua trees, provided that the county or city ensures that all permits issued satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a). The county or city shall be required to submit to the department quarterly reports documenting the number of permits issued, the number and size class of western Joshua trees authorized to be removed or trimmed, and any other information specified in the agreement with the department. A county or city entering into an agreement pursuant to this
 subdivision may impose a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of issuing the permit.

(c) (1) The department retains express authority to suspend or revoke an agreement with any county or city to delegate to the county or city the ability to authorize the removal or trimming of dead western Joshua trees or the trimming of live western Joshua trees in the event the department determines the county or city has violated the terms of the agreement or this chapter, the county or city fails to implement or enforce the terms of the agreement or this chapter, or the local population of western Joshua trees within, or in the vicinity of, that county or city needs further protection. A county or city that has entered into an agreement with the department shall conduct an annual assessment of the status of the local population of western Joshua trees within the county or city and submit the assessment to the department.
 The department shall determine if the population needs further protection to provide for the conservation of the species.

(2) The department shall adopt standardized survey and assessment methods for the annual assessment required pursuant to paragraph (1), including requiring that a desert native plant specialist conduct the assessment. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of standardized survey and assessment methods pursuant to this paragraph.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.5.

(a) The Western Joshua Tree Mitigation Fund, created by the commission pursuant to Section 749.10 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, is hereby continued in existence by this chapter, and is renamed the Western Joshua Tree Conservation Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, any moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department solely for the purposes of acquiring, conserving, and managing western Joshua tree conservation lands and completing other activities to conserve the western Joshua tree.

(b) All fees remitted to the department pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the fund.

(c) The fund may also receive other
 funding to support the conservation of the western Joshua tree.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.6.

(a) The department shall develop and implement a western Joshua tree conservation plan in collaboration with the commission, governmental agencies, California Native American tribes, and the public. The conservation plan shall incorporate a description of management actions necessary to conserve the western Joshua tree and objective, measurable criteria to assess the effectiveness of such actions. The conservation plan shall also include guidance for the avoidance and minimization of impacts to western Joshua trees and protocols for the successful relocation of western Joshua trees. The department shall present a complete draft conservation plan at a public meeting of the commission, for its review and approval, by December 31, 2024. The commission shall take final action on the conservation plan by June
 30, 2025. The department and commission shall, if necessary, periodically update the conservation plan to ensure the conservation of the species.

(b) When developing the conservation plan, the department shall consult with California Native American tribes, include co-management principles in the plan, provide for the relocation of western Joshua trees to tribal lands upon a request from a tribe, and ensure traditional ecological knowledge is incorporated into the plan.

(c) The department, pursuant to Section 1927.5, shall use any fees deposited into the fund for the purpose of addressing threats to the western Joshua tree, including, but not limited to, acquiring, conserving, and managing western Joshua tree conservation lands. Acceptable expenditures from the fund may include, but are not limited to, land acquisition or conservation easement costs, monitoring costs, restoration
 costs, transaction costs, costs of endowments for land management or easement stewardship consistent with Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate Code, and other reasonable expenditures to implement the conservation plan. The department shall prioritize actions and acquiring and managing lands that are identified as appropriate for western Joshua tree conservation in any department-approved conservation plan, including, but not limited to, the conservation plan required by subdivision (a), a regional conservation assessment, a regional conservation investment strategy, or a conceptual area protection plan.

(d) (1) The department may retain one or more consultants to assist in locating, acquiring, conserving, and managing conservation lands and completing other mitigation actions to implement
 subdivision (c).

(2) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, Part 5.5 (commencing with Section 14600) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to any action by the department to implement subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.7.

(a) Beginning in 2025, by January 31 of each calendar year, the department shall submit an annual report to the commission and the Legislature assessing the conservation status of the western Joshua tree, including, but not limited to, by detailing the number of permits issued, the number and size class of western Joshua trees authorized to be taken, the number of western Joshua trees lethally removed, the number and location of western Joshua trees relocated, the number and location of acres of western Joshua tree woodlands developed, the type, scope, and scale of mitigation measures undertaken by permittees, the number and location of acres of western Joshua tree woodlands conserved, the quality of the acres conserved, the amount of fees paid, the amount of all expenditures from the fund, the projects and
 actions funded by expenditures from the fund, the adequacy of the fees to conserve the western Joshua tree, actions taken pursuant to the conservation plan, and other relevant information. The department’s annual report shall summarize the information provided by counties and cities pursuant to agreements entered into pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1927.3 and subdivision (b) of Section 1927.4.

(b) The report to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.8.

(a) Beginning in 2026, and at least every two years thereafter, the commission shall review the status of the western Joshua tree and the effectiveness of the conservation plan in conserving the species at a public meeting to be held before August 31. Concurrent with each review conducted pursuant to this section, the department shall make recommendations to the commission, as necessary, for amendments to the conservation plan to ensure the conservation of the western Joshua tree.

(b) The department shall annually adjust the fees provided for in Section 1927.3 pursuant to Section 713. By
 June 30, 2027, and every three years thereafter, the department shall adopt and subsequently amend regulations pursuant to Section 702 adjusting the fees as necessary to ensure the conservation of the species. The department shall use total cost accounting when determining the adequacy of the fees for ensuring conservation of the species, including ensuring sufficient funds for land acquisition or conservation easement costs, monitoring costs, restoration costs, transaction costs, and the amount of endowments for land management or easement stewardship costs consistent with Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   (AB 1808)   Effective September 29, 2026.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.    Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.8.

(a) Beginning in 2026, and at least every two years thereafter, the commission shall review the status of the western Joshua tree and the effectiveness of the conservation plan in conserving the species at a public meeting to be held before August 31. Concurrent with each review conducted pursuant to this section, the department shall make recommendations to the commission, as necessary, for amendments to the conservation plan to ensure the conservation of the western Joshua tree.

(b) The department shall annually adjust the fees provided for in Section 1927.3
 pursuant to Section 713. By June 30, 2027, and every three years thereafter, the department shall adopt and subsequently amend regulations pursuant to Section 702 adjusting the fees as necessary to ensure the conservation of the species. The department shall consider making the fees proportionate to the impact of a project and the use of tiered fees by project type, size, or other criteria. The department shall use total cost accounting when determining the adequacy of the fees for ensuring
 conservation of the species, including ensuring sufficient funds for land acquisition or conservation easement costs, monitoring costs, restoration costs, transaction costs, and the amount of endowments for land management or easement stewardship costs consistent with Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 1808)   Effective September 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Sec. 4 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 816.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.9.

No later than January 1, 2033, the department shall submit to the commission an update to the status review previously submitted pursuant to Section 2074.6 for the western Joshua tree that incorporates any new scientific information relevant to the status of the species and includes an evaluation of the impact of the conservation and management efforts pursuant to this chapter. The commission shall consider the updated status review in making its findings pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2075.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.10.

This chapter is not intended to be construed as, or to be, a general project approval. It shall be the responsibility of each project proponent receiving approval from the department under this chapter to obtain all necessary permits and approvals and to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.11.

This chapter does not preclude a county or city from adopting and enforcing ordinances that require as a condition of approving a project more protective measures designed to conserve the western Joshua tree.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.12.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Significant Natural Areas [1930. - 1940.]

1930.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Areas containing diverse ecological and geological characteristics are vital to the continual health and well-being of the state’s natural resources and of its citizens.

(b) Many habitats and ecosystems that constitute the state’s natural diversity are in danger of being lost.

(c) Connectivity between wildlife habitats is important to the long-term viability of the state’s biodiversity.

(d) Preserving and connecting high-quality habitat for wildlife can
 create habitat strongholds.

(e) Increasingly fragmented habitats threaten the state’s wildlife species.

(f) There is an opportunity to provide incentive for private landowners to maintain and perpetuate significant local natural areas in their natural state.

(g) Efforts to preserve natural areas have been fragmented between federal, state, local, and private sectors.

(h) Analysis of the state’s habitat connectivity benefits from the consideration of all relevant data, including information from private and public landowners.

(i) The department’s existing mapping activities and products should be
 developed and sustained.

(j) The importance of wildlife corridors to assist in adapting to climate change has been recognized by such groups as the Western Governors’ Association, which unanimously approved a policy to protect wildlife migration corridors and crucial wildlife habitat in 2007. Individual local, state, and federal agencies have also adopted policies aimed at protecting wildlife corridors and habitat connectivity, in order to protect ecosystem health and biodiversity and to improve the resiliency of wildlife and their habitats to climate change. However, these efforts could be enhanced through establishment of a statewide policy to protect important wildlife corridors and habitat linkages where feasible and practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.   (AB 498)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1930.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Habitat stronghold” means high-quality habitat that supports wildlife in being more resilient to increasing pressures on species due to climate change and land development.

(b) “Wildlife corridor” means a habitat linkage that joins two or more areas of wildlife habitat, allowing for fish passage or the movement of wildlife from one area to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 29.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1930.5.

(a) Contingent upon funding being provided by the Wildlife Conservation Board from moneys available pursuant to Section 75055 of the Public Resources Code, or from other appropriate bond funds, upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall investigate, study, and identify those areas in the state that are most essential as wildlife corridors and habitat linkages, as well as the impacts to those wildlife corridors from climate change, and shall prioritize vegetative data development in these areas.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Wildlife Conservation Board use various funds to work with the department to complete a statewide analysis of wildlife corridors and connectivity to support conservation planning and climate change adaptation
 activities.

(c) (1) It is the policy of the state to promote the voluntary protection of wildlife corridors and habitat strongholds in order to enhance the resiliency of wildlife and their habitats to climate change, protect biodiversity, and allow for the migration and movement of species by providing connectivity between habitat lands. In order to further these goals, it is the policy of the state to encourage, wherever feasible and practicable, voluntary steps to protect the functioning of wildlife corridors through various means, as applicable and to the extent feasible and practicable, those means may include, but are not limited to:

(A) Acquisition or protection of wildlife corridors as open space through conservation easements.

(B) Installing of wildlife-friendly or directional
 fencing.

(C) Siting of mitigation and conservation banks in areas that provide habitat connectivity for affected fish and wildlife resources.

(D) Provision of roadway undercrossings, overpasses, oversized culverts, or bridges to allow for fish passage and the movement of wildlife between habitat areas.

(2) The fact that a project applicant does not take voluntary steps to protect the functioning of a wildlife corridor prior to initiating the application process for a project shall not be grounds for denying a permit or requiring additional mitigation beyond what would be required to mitigate project impacts under other applicable laws, including, but not limited to, the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3) and the California Environmental Quality Act (Division
 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that there are a number of existing efforts, including, but not limited to, efforts involving working landscapes, that are already working to achieve the policy described in subdivision (c).

(e) Subdivision (c) shall not be construed to create new regulatory requirements or modify the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (E) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2820, or the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 30.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1931.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to encourage the cooperation of federal, state, local, and private sectors, including private organizations and individuals, in efforts to maintain the state’s most significant natural areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1932.

There is hereby established the Significant Natural Areas Program, which shall be administered by the department. The department, in administering this program, shall do all of the following:

(a) Obtain access to the most recent information with respect to natural resources. In order to accomplish this, the department shall maintain, expand, and keep current a data management system, designated the California Natural Diversity Data Base, designed to document information on these resources. That data shall be made available to interested parties on request.

(b) Develop and maintain a spatial data system that identifies those areas in the state that are most essential for maintaining habitat connectivity, including wildlife
 corridors and habitat linkages. This data should include information essential for evaluating the needs of wildlife species that require habitat connectivity for their long-term conservation, including distribution and movement patterns.

(c) As appropriate, develop and maintain the database by incorporating mapping products and data developed by other state agencies.

(d) Make all of the data sets, and associated analytical products, available to the public and other government entities.

(e) Ensure cost sharing by all who use the data management system and develop an appropriate schedule of compensation to be paid by individuals using the data management system, not to exceed the actual costs for use of the data management system.

(f) Ensure recognition
 of the state’s most significant natural areas, including those affected by climate change. The department shall, after consultation with federal, state, and local agencies, education institutions, civic and public interest organizations, private organizations, landowners, and other private individuals, identify by means of periodic reports those natural areas deemed to be most significant.

(g) Seek the maintenance and perpetuation of the state’s most significant natural areas for present and future generations in the most feasible manner. The department shall consider alternative approaches for that maintenance, including alternatives to fee acquisition such as incentives, leasing, and dedication.

(h) Reduce unnecessary duplication of effort. The department shall provide coordinating services to federal, state, local, and private interests wishing to aid in the maintenance and
 perpetuation of significant natural areas.

(i) Actively pursue grants and cost-sharing opportunities with local, state, or federal agencies, or private entities that use the data sets and benefit from their creation and maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 31.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1932.5.

(a) In carrying out its responsibilities pursuant to this chapter, the department shall solicit and utilize all relevant results of existing studies and information from local government, state, and federal agencies, academic institutions, nonprofit organizations, certified environmental documents, private and public landowners, and agricultural and rangeland information developed by the Department of Conservation and agriculture associations.

(b) The department shall seek input from representatives of other state agencies, local government, federal agencies, nongovernmental conservation organizations, landowners, agriculture, recreation, scientific entities, and industry in determining essential wildlife corridors and habitat linkages. Private and public landowners shall be given a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on the wildlife characteristics of their land if it is identified pursuant to this chapter. The department shall utilize all relevant information when developing data sets and associated analytical products pursuant to this chapter.

(c) This chapter does not require, mandate, or authorize, under state or federal law, any state or local planning, zoning, or other land use action or decision.

(d) This chapter does not alter any legal rights and privileges, under state or federal law, of ownership or use of privately or publicly owned property.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the data sets and associated analytical products required pursuant to this chapter are for inventory and planning purposes and may not be suitable to support regulatory actions without additional specificity or information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 333, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1933.

No authority or responsibility provided for in this chapter shall, of itself, change or prevent the change of the use of any area identified pursuant to the Significant Natural Areas Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.

(a) The department shall undertake the development of a vegetation mapping standard for the state.

(b) The development of a state vegetation mapping standard by the department shall be done in consultation with interested stakeholders, including, but not limited to, government agencies, nongovernmental conservation organizations, landowners, agriculture, recreation, scientific entities, and industry. Components of the standard shall include the following:

(1) A published classification system for all natural and seminatural vegetation communities present in California with sufficient detail to meet the analytical needs
 of government and nongovernment entities. The classification shall be consistent with national standards adopted by the Federal Geographic Data Committee.

(2) Methods for field data collection, image interpretation, and digital map production and attribution.

(3) Manuals, training materials, tools, and database structures for use by parties interested in performing vegetation mapping according to the standard.

(4) Documented methods for performing postproject accuracy assessments to quantify the validity of the work. Private and public landowners shall be given reasonable opportunity to review, and comment on the accuracy of, the data collected on their lands.

(5) Mechanisms for integrating new map products that meet the standard into a cohesive
 database with the intent of eventually completing statewide coverage.

(c) The department shall submit a report to the budget committee of each house of the Legislature no later than January 10, 2008, providing its mapping standard and advising how the department will ensure that its standard will be updated to reflect changing technology and serve as the state’s center of expertise on vegetation mapping.

(d) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 40.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Nonvehicular Wildlife Crossings [1950. - 1950.]

1950.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “nonvehicular wildlife crossing” means a structure that allows animals to cross human-made barriers safely and includes, but is not limited to, underpasses, tunnels, viaducts, overpasses, amphibian tunnels, fish ladders, and culverts. Nonvehicular wildlife crossings are primarily habitat conservation and biodiversity projects, but also assist in avoiding collisions between vehicles and animals.

(b) The Wildlife Conservation Board may name a nonvehicular wildlife crossing if at least 25 percent of the funding to construct the crossing derives from a state source.

(c) The Wildlife Conservation Board shall consult with the Department of
 Transportation or other appropriate entities on the design of lettering and placement of any sign that displays the name of a nonvehicular wildlife crossing.

(d) The Wildlife Conservation Board may adopt criteria for the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13.5. Wildlife Connectivity Actions [1955. - 1958.]

1955.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s climate is changing. Rising temperatures, increases in the frequency and severity of extreme events like drought and wildfire, changing ocean conditions, and shifts in precipitation patterns all pose threats to California’s wildlife. These changes are shifting the habitat ranges of many California species, requiring these species to migrate to different latitudes or altitudes to locate suitable habitat necessary to survive.

(b) Land use is also changing as the state’s population continues to grow. Habitat conversion and fragmentation forces many California species to migrate in search of replacement habitat, and it also risks continued survival of species by compromising genetic diversity, among
 other things.

(c) California wildlife is losing the ability to move and migrate as habitat conversion and built infrastructure disrupt species habitat and cut off migration corridors.

(d) Habitat connectivity and wildlife migratory corridors are essential to the continued survival of many California species. Their importance will only grow as California wildlife increasingly migrates in response to climate change and resulting shifts in habitat suitability.

(e) Habitat connectivity is also necessary to reduce wildlife-vehicle collisions, which put people and wildlife at risk of injury or death.

(f) The department has several existing programs that can be used to promote habitat connectivity. It is the intent of the Legislature to expand, or clarify, two of these programs, Chapter 7.9 (commencing with Section 1797) and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850), to facilitate creation and issuance of
 mitigation credits for actions that improve wildlife connectivity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1956.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms apply:

(a) “Compensatory mitigation credit” means a credit that may be used to fulfill, in whole or in part, mitigation requirements under applicable federal, state, or local law.

(b) “Long-term durability” means doing both of the following:
